Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Water Conservation

262.670.
Declaration of legislative policy and finding of fact. [Repealed.]

262.675.
Water resources study commission. [Repealed.]

262.680.
Water as natural resource — Control and regulation — Exceptions. [Repealed.]

262.690.
Rights of riparian owners to use of water — Impounding of water. [Repealed.]